Hawaii statutes.
§660-9 Sunday. Any writ or process
authorized by this chapter may be issued or served on Sunday. [L 1870, c 32,
§29; RL 1925, §2732; RL 1935, §4317; RL 1945, §10358; RL 1955, §239-9; HRS
§660-9]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next